Washington statutes.
RCW 18.08.310

Authorization to practice required—Out-of-state firms—Associates.

(1) It is unlawful for any person to practice or offer to practice architecture in this state, or to use in connection with his or her name or otherwise assume, use, or advertise any title or description including the word "architect," "architecture," "architectural," or language tending to imply that he or she is an architect, unless the person is registered or authorized to practice in the state of Washington under this chapter.

(2) An architect or architectural firm registered in any other jurisdiction recognized by the board may offer to practice architecture in this state if:

(a) It is clearly and prominently stated in such an offer that the architect or firm is not registered to practice architecture in the state of Washington; and

(b) Prior to practicing architecture or signing a contract to provide architectural services, the architect or firm must be registered to practice architecture in this state.

(3) A person who has an accredited architectural degree may use the title "architectural associate" when enrolled in a structured training program recognized by the board and working under the direct supervision of an architect.

(4) The provisions of this section shall not affect the use of the words "architect," "architecture," or "architectural" where a person does not practice or offer to practice architecture.

[ 2019 c 67 s 1; 2010 c 129 s 1; 1985 c 37 s 2.]